California statutes. Vehicle Code
 functioning, certified ignition interlock device, pursuant to this section, in all vehicles operated by that person for a term of two years.

(3) Upon a conviction of a violation of Section 14601.2, 14601.4, or 14601.5 subsequent to three or more prior convictions of a violation of Section 23103.5, 23152, or 23153, within a 10-year period, or two or more prior convictions of Section 14601.2, 14601.4, or 14601.5, within a 10-year period, the person shall immediately install a functioning, certified ignition interlock device, pursuant to this section, in all vehicles operated by that person for a term of three years.

(k) The department shall notify the court if a person subject to this section has failed to show proof of installation within 30 days of the department informing the person
 that the person is required to install a functioning, certified ignition interlock device.

(l) Subdivisions (j), (k), (m), (n), and (o) of Section 23575 apply to this section.

(m) The requirements of this section are in addition to any other requirements of law.

(n) This section shall become operative January 1, 2033.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 485, Sec. 24) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 689, Sec. 23.   (AB 366)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Section operative January 1, 2033, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

23575.

(a) The court shall require a person convicted of a violation of Section 14601.2 to install a functioning, certified ignition interlock device on any vehicle that the person operates and prohibit the person from operating a motor vehicle unless the vehicle is equipped with a functioning, certified ignition interlock device. The term of the restriction shall be determined by the court for a period not to exceed three years from the date of conviction. The court shall notify the Department of Motor Vehicles, as specified in subdivision (a) of Section 1803, of the terms of the restrictions in accordance with subdivision (a) of Section 1804. The Department of Motor Vehicles shall place the restriction in the person’s records in the Department of Motor Vehicles.

(b) The
 court shall include on the abstract of conviction or violation submitted to the Department of Motor Vehicles under Section 1803 or 1816 the requirement and term for the use of a functioning, certified ignition interlock device. The records of the department shall reflect mandatory use of the device for the term ordered by the court.

(c) The court shall advise the person that installation of an ignition interlock device on a vehicle does not allow the person to drive without a valid driver’s license.

(d) A person whose driving privilege is restricted by the court pursuant to this section shall arrange for each vehicle with a functioning, certified ignition interlock device to be serviced by the installer at least once every 60 days in order for the installer to recalibrate and monitor the operation of the device. The installer shall notify the court if the device is removed or
 indicates that the person has attempted to remove, bypass, or tamper with the device, or if the person fails three or more times to comply with any requirement for the maintenance or calibration of the ignition interlock device. There is no obligation for the installer to notify the court if the person has complied with all of the requirements of this article.

(e) The court shall monitor the installation and maintenance of a functioning, certified ignition interlock device restriction ordered pursuant to subdivision (a) or (i). If a person fails to comply with the court order, the court shall give notice of the fact to the department pursuant to Section 40509.1.

(f) Nothing in this section permits a person to drive without a valid driver’s license.

(g) Pursuant to this section, an out-of-state resident who otherwise
 would qualify for an ignition interlock device restricted license in California shall be prohibited from operating a motor vehicle in California unless that vehicle is equipped with a functioning, certified ignition interlock device. An ignition interlock device is not required to be installed on any vehicle owned by the defendant that is not driven in California.

(h) If a medical problem does not permit a person to breathe with sufficient strength to activate the device, that person shall only have the suspension option.

(i) This section does not restrict a court from requiring installation of a functioning, certified ignition interlock device and prohibiting operation of a motor vehicle unless that vehicle is equipped with a functioning, certified ignition interlock device for a person to whom subdivision (a) does not apply. The term of the restriction shall be determined by the
 court for a period not to exceed three years from the date of conviction. The court shall notify the Department of Motor Vehicles, as specified in subdivision (a) of Section 1803, of the terms of the restrictions in accordance with subdivision (a) of Section 1804. The Department of Motor Vehicles shall place the restriction in the person’s records in the Department of Motor Vehicles.

(j) For the purposes of this section, “vehicle” does not include a motorcycle until the state certifies an ignition interlock device that can be installed on a motorcycle. Any person subject to an ignition interlock device restriction shall not operate a motorcycle for the duration of the ignition interlock device restriction period.

(k) (1) For the purposes of this section, “owned” means solely owned or owned in conjunction with another person or legal entity.

(2) For purposes of this section, “operates” includes operating a vehicle that is not owned by the person subject to this section.

(l) For the purposes of this section, “bypass” means either of the following:

(1) Failure to take any random retest.

(2) Failure to pass any random retest with a breath alcohol concentration not exceeding 0.03 percent breath alcohol concentration.

(m) The department shall adopt regulations specifying the intervals between random retests.

(n) For purposes of this section, “random retest” means a breath test performed by the driver upon a certified ignition interlock device at random intervals
 after the initial engine startup breath test and while the vehicle’s motor is running.

(o) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2019.

(p) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2033, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that is enacted before January 1,
 2033, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 485, Sec. 26) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 689, Sec. 24.   (AB 366)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2033, by its own provisions.    See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 25 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 689.)
-------------------------------------------

23575.

(a) (1) In addition to any other law, the court may require that a person convicted of a first offense violation of Section 23152 or 23153 install a functioning, certified ignition interlock device on any vehicle that the person operates and prohibit that person from operating a motor vehicle unless that vehicle is equipped with a functioning, certified ignition interlock device. The court shall give heightened consideration to applying this sanction to a first offense violator with 0.15 percent or more, by weight, of alcohol in their blood at arrest, or with two or more prior moving traffic violations, or to
 persons who refused the chemical tests at arrest. If the court orders the ignition interlock device restriction, the term shall be determined by the court for a period not to exceed three years from the date of conviction. The court shall notify the Department of Motor Vehicles, as specified in subdivision (a) of Section 1803, of the terms of the restrictions in accordance with subdivision (a) of Section 1804. The Department of Motor Vehicles shall place the restriction in the person’s records in the Department of Motor Vehicles.

(2) The court shall require a person convicted of a violation of Section 14601.2 to install a functioning, certified ignition interlock device on any vehicle that the person operates and prohibit the person from operating a motor vehicle unless the vehicle is equipped with a functioning, certified ignition interlock device. The term of the restriction shall be determined by the court for a period not to exceed three
 years from the date of conviction. The court shall notify the Department of Motor Vehicles, as specified in subdivision (a) of Section 1803, of the terms of the restrictions in accordance with subdivision (a) of Section 1804. The Department of Motor Vehicles shall place the restriction in the person’s records in the Department of Motor Vehicles.

(b) The court shall include on the abstract of conviction or violation submitted to the Department of Motor Vehicles under Section 1803 or 1816 the requirement and term for the use of a functioning, certified ignition interlock device. The records of the department shall reflect mandatory use of the device for the term ordered by the court.

(c) The court shall advise the person that installation of a functioning, certified ignition interlock device on a vehicle does not allow the person to drive without a valid driver’s license.

(d) A person whose driving privilege is restricted by the court pursuant to this section shall arrange for each vehicle with a functioning, certified ignition interlock device to be serviced by the installer at least once every 60 days in order for the installer to recalibrate and monitor the operation of the device. The installer shall notify the court if the device is removed or indicates that the person has attempted to remove, bypass, or tamper with the device, or if the person fails three or more times to comply with any requirement for the maintenance or calibration of the ignition interlock device. There is no obligation for the installer to notify the court if the person has complied with all of the requirements of this article.

(e) The court shall monitor the installation and maintenance of a functioning, certified ignition interlock device restriction ordered pursuant to
 subdivision (a) or (l). If a person fails to comply with the court order, the court shall give notice of the fact to the department pursuant to Section 40509.1.

(f) (1) If a person is convicted of a violation of Section 23152 or 23153 and the offense occurred within 10 years of one or more separate violations of Section 23152 or 23153 that resulted in a conviction, or if a person is convicted of a violation of Section 23103, as specified in Section 23103.5, and is suspended for one year under Section 13353.3, the person may apply to the Department of Motor Vehicles for a restricted driver’s license pursuant to Section 13352 or 13353.3 that prohibits the person from operating a motor vehicle unless that vehicle is equipped with a functioning, certified ignition interlock device, certified pursuant to Section 13386. The restriction shall remain in effect for at least the remaining period of the original suspension or
 revocation and until all reinstatement requirements in Section 13352 or 13353.4 are met.

(2) Pursuant to subdivision (g), the Department of Motor Vehicles shall immediately terminate the restriction issued pursuant to Section 13352 or 13353.3 and shall immediately suspend or revoke the privilege to operate a motor vehicle of a person who attempts to remove, bypass, or tamper with the device, who has the device removed prior to the termination date of the restriction, or who fails three or more times to comply with any requirement for the maintenance or calibration of the ignition interlock device ordered pursuant to Section 13352 or 13353.3. The privilege shall remain suspended or revoked for the remaining period of the originating suspension or revocation and until all reinstatement requirements in Section 13352 or 13353.4 are met, except that if the person provides proof to the satisfaction of the department that
 the person is in compliance with the restriction issued pursuant to this section, the department may, in its discretion, restore the privilege to operate a motor vehicle and reimpose the remaining term of the restriction.

(g) A person whose driving privilege is restricted by the Department of Motor Vehicles pursuant to Section 13352 or 13353.3 shall arrange for each vehicle with a functioning, certified ignition interlock device to be serviced by the installer at least once every 60 days in order for the installer to recalibrate the device and monitor the operation of the device. The installer shall notify the Department of Motor Vehicles if the device is removed or indicates that the person has attempted to remove, bypass, or tamper with the device, or if the person fails three or more times to comply with any requirement for the maintenance or calibration of the ignition interlock device. There is no
 obligation on the part of the installer to notify the department or the court if the person has complied with all of the requirements of this section.

(h) This section does not permit a person to drive without a valid driver’s license.

(i) The Department of Motor Vehicles shall include information along with the order of suspension or revocation for repeat offenders informing them that after a specified period of suspension or revocation has been completed, the person may either install a functioning, certified ignition interlock device on any vehicle that the person operates or remain with a suspended or revoked driver’s license.

(j) Pursuant to this section, an out-of-state resident who otherwise would qualify for a functioning, certified ignition interlock device restricted license in California shall be
 prohibited from operating a motor vehicle in California unless that vehicle is equipped with a functioning, certified ignition interlock device. An ignition interlock device is not required to be installed on any vehicle owned by the defendant that is not driven in California.

(k) If a medical problem does not permit a person to breathe with sufficient strength to activate the device, that person shall only have the suspension option.

(l) This section does not restrict a court from requiring installation of a functioning, certified ignition interlock device and prohibiting operation of a motor vehicle unless that vehicle is equipped with a functioning, certified ignition interlock device for a person to whom subdivision (a) or (b) does not apply. The term of the restriction shall be determined by the court for a period not to exceed three years from the date of conviction.
 The court shall notify the Department of Motor Vehicles, as specified in subdivision (a) of Section 1803, of the terms of the restrictions in accordance with subdivision (a) of Section 1804. The Department of Motor Vehicles shall place the restriction in the person’s records in the Department of Motor Vehicles.

(m) For the purposes of this section, “vehicle” does not include a motorcycle until the state certifies an ignition interlock device that can be installed on a motorcycle. Any person subject to an ignition interlock device restriction shall not operate a motorcycle for the duration of the ignition interlock device restriction period.

(n) (1) For the purposes of this section, “owned” means solely owned or owned in conjunction with another person or legal entity.

(2) For purposes of this
 section, “operates” includes operating a vehicle that is not owned by the person subject to this section.

(o) For the purposes of this section, “bypass” means either of the following:

(1) Failure to take any random retest.

(2) Failure to pass a random retest with a breath alcohol concentration not exceeding 0.03 percent breath alcohol concentration.

(p) For purposes of this section, “random retest” means a breath test performed by the driver upon a certified ignition interlock device at random intervals after the initial engine startup breath test and while the vehicle’s motor is running.

(q) This section shall become operative January 1,
 2033.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 485, Sec. 27) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 689, Sec. 25.   (AB 366)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Section operative January 1, 2033, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

23575.1.

The department may undertake a study and report its findings of that study to the Legislature on or before January 1, 2013, regarding the overall effectiveness of the use of ignition interlock devices (IID) to reduce the recidivism rate of first-time violators of Section 23152 or 23153. If the department exercises this authority, the study shall focus on those drivers who actually have an IID installed in their vehicles rather than on those who are subject to a judicial order to have an IID installed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 392, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

23575.3.

(a) In addition to any other requirement imposed by law, a court shall notify a person convicted of a violation listed in subdivision (h) that the person is required to install a functioning, certified ignition interlock device on any vehicle that the person operates and that the person is prohibited from operating a motor vehicle unless that vehicle is equipped with a functioning, certified ignition interlock device in accordance
 with this section.

(b) The Department of Motor Vehicles, upon receipt of the court’s abstract of conviction for a violation listed in subdivision (h), shall inform the convicted person of the requirements of this section, including the term for which the person is required to have a certified ignition interlock device installed. The records of the department shall reflect the mandatory use of the device for the term required and the time when the device is required to be installed by this code.

(c) The department shall advise the person that installation of a functioning, certified ignition interlock device on a vehicle does not allow the person to drive without a valid driver’s license.

(d) (1) A person who is notified by the department pursuant to subdivision (b) shall do all of the
 following:

(A) Arrange for each vehicle operated by the person to be equipped with a functioning, certified ignition interlock device by a certified ignition interlock device provider under Section 13386.

(B) Provide to the department proof of installation by submitting the “Verification of Installation” form described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 13386.

(C) Pay a fee, determined by the department, that is sufficient to cover the costs of administration of this section.

(2) A person who is notified by the department pursuant to subdivision (b), is exempt from the requirements of this subdivision until the time
 the person purchases or has access to a vehicle if, within 30 days of the notification, the person certifies to the department all of the following:

(A) The person does not own a vehicle.

(B) The person does not have access to a vehicle at their residence.

(C) The person no longer has access to the vehicle they were driving at the time
 they were arrested for a violation that subsequently resulted in a conviction for a violation listed in subdivision (h).

(D) The person acknowledges that they are only allowed to drive a vehicle that is equipped with a functioning, certified ignition interlock device.

(E) The person acknowledges that they are required to have a valid driver’s license before
 they can drive.

(F) The person acknowledges that they are subject to the requirements of this section when the person purchases or has access to a vehicle.

(e) In addition to any other restrictions the department places on the driver’s license record of the convicted person when the person is issued a restricted driver’s license pursuant to Section 13352 or 13352.4, the department shall place a restriction on the driver’s license record of the
 person that states the driver is restricted to driving only vehicles equipped with a functioning, certified ignition interlock device for the applicable term.

(f) (1) A person who is notified by the department pursuant to subdivision (b) shall arrange for each vehicle with a functioning, certified ignition interlock device to be serviced by the installer at least once every 60 days in order for the installer to recalibrate and monitor the operation of the device.

(2) The installer shall notify the department if the device is removed or indicates that the person has attempted to remove, bypass, or tamper with the device, or if the person fails three or more times to comply with any requirement for the maintenance or calibration of the ignition interlock device.

(g) The department shall monitor
 the installation and maintenance of the ignition interlock device installed pursuant to subdivision (d).

(h) A person is required to install a functioning, certified ignition interlock device pursuant to this section for the applicable term, as follows:

(1) A person convicted of a violation of subdivision (a), (b), (d), (e), or (g) of Section 23152 shall be required to do the following, as applicable:

(A) Upon a conviction with no priors, punishable under Section 23536, only one of the following may occur:

(i) The court may order installation of a functioning, certified ignition interlock device on any vehicle that the person operates and prohibit that person from operating a motor vehicle unless that vehicle is equipped with a functioning, certified
 ignition interlock device. If the court orders the ignition interlock device restriction, the term shall be determined by the court for a period not to exceed six months from the date of conviction. The court shall notify the department of the conviction as specified in subdivision (a) of Section 1803 or Section 1816, and shall specify the terms of the ignition interlock device restriction in accordance with subdivision (a) of Section 1804. The department shall place the restriction on the driver’s license record of the person that states the driver is restricted to driving only vehicles equipped with a functioning, certified ignition interlock device for the applicable term.

(ii) The person may apply to the department for a restriction of the driving privilege under Section 13352.4.

(iii) The person may apply to the department for a restriction of the driving privilege under
 paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 13352 or subdivision (c) of Section 13352.1.

(B) Upon a conviction with one prior, punishable under Section 23540, the person shall install a functioning, certified ignition interlock device in the vehicle, as ordered by the court, that is operated by that person for a mandatory term of 12 months.

(C) Upon a conviction with two priors, punishable under Section 23546, the person shall install a functioning, certified ignition interlock device in the vehicle, as ordered by the court, that is operated by that person for a mandatory term of 24 months.

(D) Upon a conviction with three or more priors punishable under Section 23550, or a conviction punishable under Section 23550.5, the person shall install a functioning, certified ignition interlock device in the vehicle, as
 ordered by the court, that is operated by that person for a mandatory term of 36 months.

(2) A person convicted of a violation of subdivision (a), (b), (d), (e), or (g) of Section 23153 shall install a functioning, certified ignition interlock device, as follows:

(A) Upon a conviction with no priors, punishable under Section 23554, the person shall install a functioning, certified ignition interlock device in the vehicle, as ordered by the court, that is operated by that person for a mandatory term of 12 months.

(B) Upon a conviction with one prior, punishable under Section 23560, the person shall install a functioning, certified ignition interlock device in the vehicle, as ordered by the court, that is operated by that person for a mandatory term of 24 months.

(C) Upon a conviction with two priors, punishable under Section 23550 or 23566, the person shall install a functioning, certified ignition interlock device in the vehicle, as ordered by the court, that is operated by that person for a mandatory term of 36 months.

(D) Upon a conviction with one prior punishable under Section 23550.5, the person shall install a functioning, certified ignition interlock device in the vehicle, as ordered by the court, that is operated by that person for a mandatory term of 48 months.

(3) For the purposes of paragraphs (1) and (2), “prior” means a conviction for a separate violation of Section 23103, as specified in Section 23103.5, or Section 23152 or 23153, subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 191.5 of, or subdivision (a) of Section 192.5 of, the Penal Code, or subdivision (b), (c), (d), (e), or (f) of Section 655 of the Harbors and
 Navigation Code, that occurred within 10 years of the current violation.

(4) The terms prescribed in this subdivision shall begin once a person has complied with subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) and either upon the reinstatement of the privilege to drive pursuant to Section 13352 or the issuance of a restricted driver’s license pursuant to Section 13352. A person shall receive credit for any period in which they had a restricted driver’s license issued pursuant to Section 13353.6 or 13353.75.

(i) Subdivisions (g), (h), (j), and (k) of Section 23575 apply to this section.

(j) If a person fails to
 comply with any of the requirements regarding ignition interlock devices, the period in which the person was not in compliance shall not be credited towards the mandatory term for which the ignition interlock device is required to be installed.

(k) (1) Every manufacturer and manufacturer’s agent certified by the department to provide ignition interlock devices, under Section 13386, shall adopt the following fee schedule that provides for the payment of the costs of the certified ignition interlock device by offenders subject to this chapter in amounts commensurate with that person’s income relative to the federal poverty level, as defined in Section 127400 of the Health and Safety Code:

(A) A person with an income at 100 percent of the federal poverty level or below and who provides income verification pursuant to paragraph (2) is responsible for 10 percent
 of the cost of the manufacturer’s standard ignition interlock device program costs, and any additional costs accrued by the person for noncompliance with program requirements.

(B) A person with an income at 101 to 200 percent of the federal poverty level and who provides income verification pursuant to paragraph (2) is responsible for 25 percent of the cost of the manufacturer’s standard ignition interlock device program costs, and any additional costs accrued by the person for noncompliance with program requirements.

(C) A person with an income at 201 to 300 percent of the federal poverty level and who provides income verification pursuant to paragraph (2) is responsible for 50 percent of the cost of the manufacturer’s standard ignition interlock device program costs, and any additional costs accrued by the person for noncompliance with program requirements.

(D) A person who is receiving CalFresh benefits and who provides proof of those benefits to the manufacturer or manufacturer’s agent or authorized installer is responsible for 50 percent of the cost of the manufacturer’s standard ignition interlock device program costs, and any additional costs accrued by the person for noncompliance with program requirements.

(E) A person with an income at 301 to 400 percent of the federal poverty level and who provides income verification pursuant to paragraph (2) is responsible for 90 percent of the cost of the manufacturer’s standard ignition interlock device program costs, and any additional costs accrued by the person for noncompliance with program requirements.

(F) All other offenders are responsible for 100 percent of the cost of the ignition interlock device.

(G) The manufacturer is responsible for the percentage of costs that the offender is not responsible for pursuant to subparagraphs (A) to (E), inclusive.

(2) The ignition interlock device provider shall verify the offender’s income to determine the cost of the ignition interlock device pursuant to this subdivision by verifying one of the following documents from the offender:

(A) The previous year’s federal income tax return.

(B) The previous three months of weekly or monthly income statements.

(C) Employment Development Department verification of unemployment benefits.

(l) The Department of Consumer Affairs may impose a civil
 assessment not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) upon a manufacturer or manufacturer’s agent certified to provide ignition interlock devices who fails to inform an offender subject to this chapter of the provisions of subdivision (k), or who fails to comply with the provisions of subdivision (k).

(m) This section does not permit a person to drive without a valid driver’s license.

(n) The requirements of this section are in addition to any other requirements of law.

(o) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Bypass” means either of the following:

(A) Failure to take any random retest.

(B) Failure to pass a random retest with a breath alcohol concentration not exceeding 0.03 percent, by weight of alcohol, in the person’s blood.

(2) “Operates” includes operating a vehicle that is not owned by the person subject to this section.

(3) “Owned” means solely owned or owned in conjunction with another person or legal entity.

(4) “Random retest” means a breath test performed by the driver upon a certified ignition interlock device at random intervals after the initial engine startup breath test and while the vehicle’s motor is running.

(5) “Vehicle” does not include a motorcycle until the state certifies an ignition interlock device that can be installed on a motorcycle. A person subject to an ignition interlock device restriction
 shall not operate a motorcycle for the duration of the ignition interlock device restriction period.

(p) The requirements of this section shall apply only to a person who is convicted for a violation of Section 23152 or 23153 that occurred on or after January 1, 2019.

(q) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2019.

(r) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2033, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that is enacted before January 1,
 2033, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 689, Sec. 26.   (AB 366)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2033, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

23575.5.

(a) On or before March 1, 2024, the Department of Motor Vehicles shall report data to the Transportation Agency regarding the implementation and efficacy of the program enacted by the act that added this section.

(b) The data described in subdivision (a) shall, at a minimum, include all of the following:

(1) The number of individuals who were required to have a functioning, certified ignition interlock device installed as a result of the program who killed or injured anyone in a crash while they were operating a vehicle under the influence of alcohol.

(2) The number of individuals who were required to have a functioning, certified ignition interlock device installed as a result of the program who were convicted of an alcohol-related violation of Section 23103, as specified in Section 23103.5, or Section 23140, 23152, or 23153, or Section 191.5 or subdivision (a) of Section 192.5 of the Penal Code during the term in which the person was required to have the ignition interlock device installed.

(3) The number of injuries and deaths resulting from alcohol-related motor vehicle crashes between January 1, 2019, and January 1, 2024, inclusive, and during periods of
 similar duration prior to the implementation of the program.

(4) The number of individuals who have been convicted more than one time for driving under the influence of alcohol between January 1, 2019, and January 1, 2024, inclusive, and periods of similar duration prior to the implementation of the program.

(5) Any other information requested by the Transportation Agency to assess the effectiveness of the statewide ignition interlock device requirement in reducing recidivism for driving-under-the-influence violations.

(c) The Transportation Agency may contract with educational institutions to obtain and analyze the data required by this section.

(d) The Transportation Agency shall assess the program based on the data provided pursuant to subdivision (b) and shall report to the Legislature on the outcomes of the program no later than January 1, 2025.

(e) The report described in subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(f) (1) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2019.

(2) This section is repealed as of January 1, 2029, unless a later enacted statute, that becomes operative on or before January 1, 2029, deletes or extends the dates on which it becomes inoperative and is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 81, Sec. 6.   (AB 2198)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

23576.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 13352, 13352.1, 13353.6, 13353.75, 23573, 23575, 23575.3, and 23700, if a person is required to operate a motor vehicle in the course and scope of their employment and if the vehicle is owned by the employer, the person may operate that vehicle without installation of a functioning, certified approved ignition interlock device if the employer has been notified by the person that the person’s driving privilege has been restricted pursuant to Section 13352, 13352.1, 13353.6, 13353.75, 23573, 23575, 23575.3, or 23700 and if the person has proof of that notification in
 their possession, or if the notice, or a facsimile copy thereof, is with the vehicle.

(b) A motor vehicle owned by a business entity that is all or partly owned or controlled by a person otherwise subject to Section 13352, 13352.1, 13353.6, 13353.75, 23573, 23575, 23575.3, or 23700, is not a motor vehicle owned by the employer subject to the exemption in subdivision (a).

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2019.

(d) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2033, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that is
 enacted before January 1,
 2033, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 485, Sec. 29) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 689, Sec. 27.   (AB 366)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2033, by its own provisions.    See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 28 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 689.)
-------------------------------------------

23576.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 23575 and 23700, if a person is required to operate a motor vehicle in the course and scope of their employment and if the vehicle is owned by the employer, the person may operate that vehicle without installation of a functioning, certified ignition interlock device if the employer has been notified by the person that the person’s driving privilege has been restricted pursuant to Section 23575 or 23700 and if the person has proof of that notification in
 their possession, or if the notice, or a facsimile copy thereof, is with the vehicle.

(b) A motor vehicle owned by a business entity that is all or partly owned or controlled by a person otherwise subject to Section 23575 or 23700 is not a motor vehicle owned by the employer subject to the exemption in subdivision (a).

(c) This section shall become operative January 1, 2033.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 783, Sec. 39) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 689, Sec. 28.   (AB 366)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Section operative January 1, 2033, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

23577.

(a) If a person is convicted of a violation of Section 23152 or 23153, and at the time of the arrest leading to that conviction that person willfully refused a peace officer’s request to submit to, or willfully failed to complete, the breath or urine tests pursuant to Section 23612, the court shall impose the following penalties:

(1) If the person is convicted of a first violation of Section 23152, notwithstanding any other provision of subdivision (a) of Section 23538, the terms and conditions of probation shall include the conditions in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 23538.

(2) If the person is convicted of a first violation of Section 23153, the punishment shall be enhanced by an imprisonment of 48 continuous hours in the county jail, whether or not probation is granted and no part of which may be stayed, unless the person is sentenced to, and incarcerated in, the state prison and the execution of that sentence is not stayed.

(3) If the person is convicted of a second violation of Section 23152, punishable under Section 23540, or a second violation of Section 23153, punishable under Section 23560, the punishment shall be enhanced by an imprisonment of 96 hours in the county
 jail, whether or not probation is granted and no part of which may be stayed, unless the person is sentenced to, and incarcerated in, the state prison and execution of that sentence is not stayed.

(4) If the person is convicted of a third violation of Section 23152, punishable under Section 23546, the punishment shall be enhanced by an imprisonment of 10 days in the county jail, whether or not probation is granted and no part of which may be stayed.

(5) If the person is convicted of a fourth or subsequent violation of Section 23152, punishable under Section 23550 or 23550.5, the punishment shall be enhanced by imprisonment of 18 days in the county jail, whether or not probation is granted and no part of which may be stayed.

(b) The willful refusal or failure to complete the
 breath or urine test required pursuant to Section 23612 shall be pled and proven.

(c) The penalties in this section do not apply to a person who refused to submit to or complete a blood test pursuant to Section 23612. This section does not prohibit imposition of administrative actions involving driving privileges.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 177, Sec. 1.   (AB 2717)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

23578.

In addition to any other provision of this code, if a person is convicted of a violation of Section 23152 or 23153, the court shall consider a concentration of alcohol in the person’s blood of 0.15 percent or more, by weight, or the refusal of the person to take a breath or urine test, as a special factor that may justify enhancing the penalties in sentencing, in determining whether to grant probation, and, if probation is granted, in determining additional or enhanced terms and conditions of probation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 177, Sec. 2.   (AB 2717)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

23580.
